Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0159.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. For the purposes of this act, the definitions in section 3 of the event online ticket sales act apply to the use of those terms in this act. Sec. 3. The attorney general shall investigate a claim that a person has violated the event online ticket sales act. Sec. 5. (1) A person that violates the event online ticket sales act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00. A civil fine collected under this section must be deposited in the general fund. (2) Each ticket transaction in which a ticket is acquired in violation of the event online ticket sales act constitutes a separate violation for the purpose of assessing a civil fine under this section. Sec. 7. (1) If the attorney general determines that a person is in the process of violating the event online ticket sales act, the attorney general may bring a civil action to restrain or enjoin the person from continuing to violate the event online ticket sales act. (2) If the attorney general determines that a person has violated the event online ticket sales act, the attorney general may bring a civil action against the person to collect the civil fine as provided for under section 5. The attorney general may also recover restitution. (3) A person that violates a court order or injunction issued to enforce the event online ticket sales act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $5,000.00. Sec. 9. The court may allow the attorney general to recover reasonable costs and attorney fees incurred in an action resulting in the imposition of a civil fine under this act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 158 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.